Indiana, session 2026, HB1272.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-0.5-3-19, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. IC 25-1-2-6(b) applies to the private
investigator, and security guard, and collateral recovery agency
licensing board.
SECTION 2. IC 25-0.5-4-26, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26. The private investigator, and security guard,
and collateral recovery agency licensing board (IC 25-30-1-5.2) is a
board under IC 25-1-4.
SECTION 3. IC 25-0.5-7-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. The Indiana professional licensing agency
shall perform administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for
the private investigator, and security guard, and collateral recovery
agency licensing board (IC 25-30-1-5.2) under IC 25-1-6-3(a).
SECTION 4. IC 25-0.5-8-23, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
2026 IN 1272—LS 6963/DI 154


SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. An occupation for which a person is licensed,
certified, or registered by the private investigator, and security guard,
and collateral recovery agency licensing board (IC 25-30-1-5.2) is a
regulated occupation under IC 25-1-7.
SECTION 5. IC 25-0.5-9-24, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. The private investigator, and security guard,
and collateral recovery agency licensing board (IC 25-30-1-5.2) is a
board under IC 25-1-8.
SECTION 6. IC 25-0.5-10-26, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26. The private investigator, and security guard,
and collateral recovery agency licensing board (IC 25-30-1-5.2) is a
board under IC 25-1-8-6.
SECTION 7. IC 25-0.5-12-12, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. The private investigator, and security guard,
and collateral recovery agency licensing board (IC 25-30-1-5.2) is a
board under IC 25-1-11.
SECTION 8. IC 25-30-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2008,
SECTION 196, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Person" means an individual, a firm, a company, an
association, an organization, a partnership, or a corporation.
(2) "Licensee" means a person licensed under this chapter.
(3) "Private investigator firm" means the business of:
(A) making, for hire or reward, investigation or investigations
for the purpose of obtaining information with reference to:
(i) a crime against the state or wrongs done or threatened;
(ii) the habits, conduct, movements, whereabouts,
association, transactions, reputation, or character of a
person;
(iii) credibility of witnesses or other persons;
(iv) the location or recovery of lost, abandoned, unclaimed,
or stolen property;
(v) the causes, origin, or responsibility for fires or accidents
or injuries to real or personal property; or
(vi) the truth or falsity of a statement or representation;
(B) securing, for hire or reward, evidence to be used for
authorized investigation committees or boards of award or
arbitration or in the trial of civil or criminal cases; or
2026 IN 1272—LS 6963/DI 154


(C) providing, for hire or reward, undercover investigators to
detect and prevent fraud and theft in the workplace or
elsewhere.
(4) "Board" refers to the private investigator, and security guard,
and collateral recovery agency licensing board established
under section 5.2 of this chapter.
(5) "Licensing agency" refers to the Indiana professional licensing
agency established under IC 25-1-5-3.
(6) "Business entity" means a firm, a company, an association, an
organization, a partnership, or a corporation.
(7) "Collateral recovery agency" refers to a person licensed
under IC 25-30-3.
SECTION 9. IC 25-30-1-5.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 123, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.2. (a) The private investigator,
and security guard, and collateral recovery agency licensing board is
established.
(b) The board consists of:
(1) the superintendent of the state police department or the
superintendent's designee; and
(2) subject to IC 25-1-6.5-3, the following four (4) six (6)
members appointed by the governor:
(A) One (1) individual who is associated with a private
investigator firm licensed under this article.
(B) One (1) individual who is associated with a security guard
agency licensed under this article.
(C) One (1) local law enforcement official.
(D) One (1) person who is not associated with the private
investigator firm or security guard agency other than as a
consumer.
(E) Two (2) individuals who are associated with a
collateral recovery agency.
(c) Each member of the board appointed by the governor shall serve
a term under IC 25-1-6.5.
(d) The governor may remove a board member appointed by the
governor under IC 25-1-6.5-4.
(e) A vacancy in the membership of the board shall be filled by
appointment by the governor under IC 25-1-6.5.
(f) Each member of the board is entitled to reimbursement for
traveling expenses and other expenses actually incurred in connection
with the member's duties, as provided in the state travel policies and
procedures established by the Indiana department of administration and
2026 IN 1272—LS 6963/DI 154


approved by the budget agency.
SECTION 10. IC 25-30-1-6.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 124, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) The board shall meet upon
the call of the board president.
(b) Three (3) Four (4) members of the board constitute a quorum.
SECTION 11. IC 25-30-1.3-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.185-2007,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "board" refers to the
private investigator, and security guard, and collateral recovery
agency licensing board established under IC 25-30-1-5.2.
SECTION 12. IC 25-30-3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 3. Collateral Recovery Agency Licensing
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to the following persons
when engaged in an activity otherwise covered by this chapter:
(1) A financial institution or an employee of a financial
institution if the activity is conducted by the employee on
behalf of that financial institution.
(2) An automobile rental company or an employee of an
automobile rental company if the activity is conducted by the
employee on behalf of the automobile rental company.
(3) A retail seller of equipment (as defined in IC 26-1-9.1-102),
or an employee of a retail seller of equipment, if the activity
is limited to the repossession of the type of goods routinely
sold by the retail seller in the manner authorized by
IC 26-1-9.1-609 on behalf of the owner of a security interest
in that collateral.
(4) An entity or an employee of an entity that primarily
finances wholesale and retail transactions related to the
purchase or lease of equipment manufactured by the entity's
affiliate if the activity is limited to the repossession of the
equipment.
Sec. 2. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions
apply:
(1) "Assignment" means a written authorization by a legal
owner, lien holder, lessor, lessee, or licensed collateral
recovery agency to locate or repossess, involuntarily or
voluntarily, any collateral that:
(A) is subject to a security agreement that contains a
repossession clause; or
2026 IN 1272—LS 6963/DI 154


(B) is the subject of a rental or lease agreement.
The term includes written authorization by an employer to
recover any collateral entrusted to an employee or former
employee if the possessor is wrongfully in possession of the
collateral. A photocopy, facsimile copy, or electronic copy of
an assignment has the same force and effect as an original
written assignment.
(2) "Automobile rental company" means a person whose
primary business is renting motor vehicles to the public for
thirty (30) days or less.
(3) "Board" refers to the private investigator, security guard,
and collateral recovery agency licensing board established by
IC 25-30-1-5.2.
(4) "Collateral" means any personal property that is subject
to a security, lease, or rental agreement. The term does not
include a recreational vehicle permanently attached to a
foundation and used as a primary residence.
(5) "Collateral recovery agency" means any person that, for
consideration:
(A) advertises as providing; or
(B) is engaged in the business of performing;
a repossession. The term includes a person that uses license
plate recognition for the purpose of performing a
repossession.
(6) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt by a federal
or state court resulting from plea or trial, regardless of
whether imposition of sentence was suspended.
(7) "Debtor" means any person obligated under a lease,
rental, or security agreement.
(8) "Felony" means a criminal conviction for which the
convicted person might have been imprisoned for more than
one (1) year.
(9) "Financial institution" has the meaning set forth in
IC 28-1-1-3.
(10) "Hazardous material" means a material or waste that
has been determined to be hazardous or potentially hazardous
to human health, to property, or to the environment by:
(A) the United States:
(i) Environmental Protection Agency;
(ii) Nuclear Regulatory Commission;
(iii) Department of Transportation; or
(iv) Occupational Safety and Health Administration; or
2026 IN 1272—LS 6963/DI 154


(B) the environmental rules board established by
IC 13-13-8-3.
The term includes all of the hazardous materials identified in
49 CFR 172.101.
(11) "Indemnification" means any agreement that seeks to
indemnify and insure another against any type of claim, loss,
liability, recovery, or damages.
(12) "Legal owner" means a person holding:
(A) a security interest in any collateral that is subject to a
security agreement;
(B) a lien against any collateral; or
(C) an interest in any collateral that is subject to a lease or
rental agreement.
(13) "Licensee" means any person licensed as a collateral
recovery agency under this chapter.
(14) "License plate recognition" means a technology that uses
a camera and software to:
(A) identify and read a vehicle's license plate;
(B) compare images of license plates to a data base; and
(C) provide both live and historical data.
(15) "Person" means an individual, a firm, a company, an
agency, an organization, a partnership, or a corporation.
(16) "Personal effects" means:
(A) any property contained within or on the repossessed
collateral; or
(B) property that is not permanently affixed to the
repossessed collateral;
that is not the property of the legal owner, including
hazardous materials.
(17) "Personal information" means:
(A) information that identifies or reasonably can be used
to identify an individual, such as first and last name in
combination with the individual's:
(i) Social Security number or other government issued
number or identifier;
(ii) date of birth;
(iii) home or physical address;
(iv) electronic mail address or other online contact
information or Internet provider address;
(v) financial account number or credit or debit card
number;
(vi) biometric data, health or medical data, or insurance
2026 IN 1272—LS 6963/DI 154


information; or
(vii) passwords or other credentials that permit access to
an online or other account;
(B) personally identifiable financial or insurance
information, including nonpublic personal information
defined by applicable federal law; and
(C) any combination of data that, if accessed, disclosed,
modified, or destroyed without authorization of the owner
of the data or if lost or misused, would require notice or
reporting under IC 4-1-11 and federal privacy and data
security law, whether or not the attorney general or the
attorney general's agent is subject to the law.
(18) "Principal officer" means an individual who holds the
office of owner, president, vice president, secretary, or
treasurer in a business.
(19) "Remote storage location" means a licensee's secured
storage facility that:
(A) is designated for the storage of collateral; and
(B) is either a secure building or has a perimeter that is
secured with a fencing construction that makes the area
not accessible to the public.
(20) "Repossession" means to take physical possession of
personal property that was used as collateral.
Sec. 3. Unless licensed under this chapter, a person may not:
(1) repossess collateral in Indiana;
(2) attempt to repossess collateral in Indiana;
(3) hold one's self out to be a collateral recovery agency; or
(4) use license plate recognition to repossess collateral in
Indiana.
Sec. 4. (a) An application for licensure as a collateral recovery
agency must be on a form prescribed by the board accompanied by
the license fee established by the board under IC 25-1-8.
(b) The application for licensure as a collateral recovery agency
must include the following:
(1) The applicant's full name and business's street address.
(2) The business name under which the applicant intends to do
business as a collateral recovery agency.
(3) The full name and residential address of each of the
collateral recovery agency's members, partners, directors,
and managers.
(4) The applicant's:
(A) Social Security number, if an individual; or
2026 IN 1272—LS 6963/DI 154


(B) federal employer identification number.
(5) The following information concerning an owner or officer
in control or management of the collateral recovery agency:
(A) Name and any aliases.
(B) Age and date of birth.
(C) Place of birth.
(D) Social Security number or alien registration number,
whichever is applicable.
(E) Current residence address and mailing address.
(F) A statement of all criminal convictions, findings of
guilt, and pleas of guilty or nolo contendere, regardless of
adjudication of guilt.
(G) One (1) passport type color photograph taken not more
than six (6) months immediately preceding submission of
the application.
(H) A personal inquiry waiver that allows the board to
conduct necessary investigations to satisfy the
requirements of this chapter.
(I) Any further facts as may be required by the board to
show that the individual signing the application is of good
moral character and qualified by experience and training
to satisfy the requirements of this chapter.
(6) Proof of certification and training from a nationally
recognized program, such as:
(A) the American Recovery Association's Certified
Collateral Recovery Specialist (CCRS) program; or
(B) the Recovery Industry Services Company's (RISC)
training program.
(7) Evidence demonstrating that the applicant maintains a
remote storage location.
(8) Any other information required by the board.
(c) The board may not issue a license in any:
(1) fictitious name that may be confused with or is similar to
any federal, state, county, or municipal agency;
(2) name that may give an individual the impression that the
applicant engages in a business in which the applicant does
not engage;
(3) name that is the same as or is similar to the name of an
existing licensed collateral recovery agency; or
(4) name that is deceptive or misleading.
(d) The board may not issue a license to an applicant if the
applicant does not maintain a remote storage location.
2026 IN 1272—LS 6963/DI 154


Sec. 5. A licensee must maintain the following:
(1) A physical location with signage within Indiana.
(2) The ability to store a vehicle that has been repossessed.
(3) The ability to store personal effects in a secured area out
of the elements.
(4) Reasonable hours that allow an individual ample
opportunity to retrieve the individual's personal effects or
collateral.
(5) Required insurance under section 6 of this chapter.
Sec. 6. (a) A licensee shall provide the board with a certification
of insurance evidencing coverage in the amount required under
this section.
(b) The coverage must:
(1) include the board as an additional insured for the purpose
of receiving all notices of any modification or cancellation of
the insurance;
(2) be written by an insurance company that is lawfully
engaged to provide insurance coverage in Indiana;
(3) provide for a combined single limit policy in the amount of
at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) per occurrence and a
three million dollar ($3,000,000) aggregate policy, which
must:
(A) include commercial general liability for wrongful
repossession, garage keepers, on hook, and drive away;
and
(B) be a direct primary policy;
(4) provide for a dishonesty bond policy in the amount of at
least one million dollars ($1,000,000); and
(5) insure for the liability of all employees licensed or
registered by the state while acting in the course of the
employee's employment.
(c) The licensee shall notify the board immediately upon
cancellation of the insurance policy, whether the cancellation was
initiated by the insurance company or the licensee.
(d) The board shall suspend the licensee's license on the date of
cancellation of the policy, unless new evidence of insurance is
provided to the board before the effective date of cancellation.
Sec. 7. An individual who has been convicted of a felony does not
qualify for a collateral recovery agency license under this chapter.
Sec. 8. This chapter does not preclude a domestic or foreign
limited liability company from being licensed as a collateral
recovery agency under this chapter.
2026 IN 1272—LS 6963/DI 154


Sec. 9. At all times, a licensee's license must be conspicuously
displayed at the licensee's location on record with the board.
Sec. 10. (a) Equipment used for repossessions must:
(1) be registered in the state of Indiana;
(2) display the company name and Indiana department of
transportation number;
(3) bear a state licensing placard; and
(4) be inspected annually and maintain a valid Federal Motor
Carrier Safety Administration inspection.
(b) A licensee shall provide the board with evidence of
applicable insurance for the licensee's remote storage location that
specifies the licensee as the primary policy holder.
Sec. 11. (a) A licensee must store collateral in a secure location
within Indiana after repossession until the collateral is either:
(1) redeemed; or
(2) transferred to auction.
(b) The licensee may charge a reasonable fee for storing
collateral in the secure location. However, the licensee may charge
an additional fee for collateral that contains hazardous materials.
(c) The fee described in subsection (b) may be charged to either
the:
(1) debtor; or
(2) legal owner.
(d) If personal effects are contained in or on collateral at the
time of repossession, the licensee shall inventory and store the
personal effects until either:
(1) returned to the debtor; or
(2) disposed of in accordance with this section.
(e) If personal effects contained in or on collateral at the time of
repossession have an estimated value of at least ten dollars ($10),
the legal owner of the collateral shall provide the debtor with
written notice of the following:
(1) A list of each item of personal effects having an estimated
value of at least five dollars ($5).
(2) The estimated aggregate of all the items of personal
effects.
(3) A statement that if the debtor does not claim the property
not more than thirty (30) days after the notice was sent, the
personal effects will become the property of the licensee with
no right of redemption by the debtor.
The notice under this subsection must be sent by certified mail.
(f) If personal effects are not claimed by the debtor not more
2026 IN 1272—LS 6963/DI 154


than thirty (30) days after the legal owner sends notice under
subsection (e), the licensee may dispose of the personal effects.
However, the licensee shall:
(1) surrender illegal items or contraband to local law
enforcement; and
(2) retain a receipt or other proof of surrender as part of the
licensee's records.
Sec. 12. (a) If the licensee has reason to believe that the
collateral collects or stores personal information, the licensee shall
eliminate the personal information collected or stored in the
collateral by using a standardized electronic solution:
(1) as soon as practicable after repossession; and
(2) before releasing the collateral from the licensee's
possession.
(b) A licensee who complies with this section is not subject to
civil liability.
SECTION 13. IC 26-2-10-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter,
"collateral recovery agency" means a person licensed under
IC 25-30-3.
SECTION 14. IC 26-2-10-2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "motor vehicle repossession
agent" means a person who physically repossesses a motor vehicle or
watercraft on behalf of another person or on the person's own behalf.
SECTION 15. IC 26-2-10-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.38-2009,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A motor vehicle repossession agent who
collateral recovery agency that repossesses or intends to repossess a
motor vehicle or watercraft must provide the following information, if
available, to the sheriff's department of the county having jurisdiction
in the location where the motor vehicle repossession agent collateral
recovery agency believes that the motor vehicle or watercraft will be
found:
(1) The identity of the repossession company. collateral recovery
agency.
(2) A description of the motor vehicle or watercraft.
(3) The name and address of the person believed to be currently
in possession of the motor vehicle or watercraft (if the
repossession has not yet occurred), or believed to have been in
possession of the motor vehicle (if the repossession has already
occurred).
2026 IN 1272—LS 6963/DI 154


(4) The address where the motor vehicle repossession agent
collateral recovery agency believes that the motor vehicle or
watercraft will be found (if the repossession has not yet occurred),
or the address where the motor vehicle was found when it was
repossessed.
(b) A motor vehicle repossession agent collateral recovery agency
must provide the information described in subsection (a):
(1) before the repossession occurs; or
(2) not later than two (2) hours after the repossession.
SECTION 16. IC 26-2-10-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.38-2009,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. A motor vehicle repossession agent who
collateral recovery agency that violates section 6 of this chapter
commits a Class C infraction.
SECTION 17. IC 34-30-2.1-384.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 384.3. IC 25-30-3-12 (Concerning
the elimination of personal information by a collateral recovery
agency).
2026 IN 1272—LS 6963/DI 154